Utah statutes.
78B-11-112.   Appointment of arbitrator -- Service as a neutral arbitrator.
(1)  If the parties to an agreement to arbitrate agree on a method for
appointing an arbitrator, that method must be followed, unless the method
fails.  If the parties have not agreed on a method, the agreed method fails,
or an arbitrator appointed fails or is unable to act and a successor has not
been appointed, the court, on motion of a party to the arbitration proceeding,
shall appoint the arbitrator.  An arbitrator appointed by the court has all
the powers of an arbitrator designated in the agreement to arbitrate or
appointed pursuant to the agreed method.
(2)  An individual who has a known, direct, and material interest in the
outcome of the arbitration proceeding or a known, existing, and substantial
relationship with a party may not serve as an arbitrator required by an
agreement to be neutral.
